West Virginia, session 2026, SB309.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §17A-2-9 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (motor vehicle equipment, 91 CSR 11), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §17A-2A-8 of this code, modified by the Division of Motor Vehicles to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 22, 2025, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (compulsory motor vehicle liability insurance, 91 CSR 13), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §17A-13-1 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (special purpose vehicles, 91 CSR 25), is authorized. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home